Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.245

Execution and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(1) If a person required by the entity's organic law to execute a record that is to be an entity filing or to make an entity filing does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the superior court to order:

(a) The person to execute the record;

(b) The person to make the entity filing; or

(c) The secretary of state to file the entity filing unexecuted.

(2) If the petitioner under subsection (1) of this section is not the entity to which the entity filing pertains, the petitioner shall make the entity a party to the action.

(3) A filed record created under subsection (1)(c) of this section is effective without being executed.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.